Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 164.6941 TO 164.6951 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Athletics coach" or "coach" means an employee of an institution or an
institution's agent whose duties include the management or operation of an
institution's intercollegiate athletics team;
(b) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(c) "Intercollegiate athletics compensation" means any compensation, whether
through a contract or not, given to a student-athlete or athletics coach:
1. For the use of the name, image, or likeness of a student-athlete or
coach; or
2. To compensate the student-athlete or coach for participating in
intercollegiate athletics; and
(d) "Intercollegiate athletics enterprise" or "enterprise" means a person or
entity that provides student-athletes or coaches with intercollegiate athletics
compensation.
(2) (a) An intercollegiate athletics enterprise that provides a cumulative sum of
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in intercollegiate athletics
compensation in any calendar year to coaches and student-athletes shall
register with the council as an intercollegiate athletics enterprise within five
(5) days of meeting the amount.
(b) An enterprise may proactively register with the council prior to exceeding
the one thousand dollar ($1,000) threshold.
(3) Upon registration under subsection (2) of this section, the council shall issue the
intercollegiate athletics enterprise a certificate of registration, and the enterprise
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1867
may continue to engage in intercollegiate athletics compensation in compliance
with the laws of the Commonwealth, including this section, and may renew the
registration annually.
(4) An applicant for registration as an intercollegiate athletics enterprise shall
submit an application to the council in a form prescribed by the council and shall
include necessary information for the enforcement of this section.
(5) The council may refuse to issue a certificate of registration to an applicant that
has previously violated this section or engaged in conduct that significantly
adversely reflects on the applicant's fitness to engage in intercollegiate athletics
compensation.
(6) Each registered intercollegiate athletics enterprise shall:
(a) Quarterly report to the council all contracts entered into with student-
athletes and coaches, the institution at which the student-athlete is enrolled
or coach is employed, and the amounts of intercollegiate athletics
compensation provided to each student-athlete and coach; and
(b) By April 15 of each year, pay an annual registration fee to the council equal
to ten percent (10%) of all intercollegiate athletics compensation that the
enterprise provided to student-athletes and coaches in the previous year.
The council may establish financial penalties for failure to comply with this
subsection.
(7) The department shall deposit all fees and penalties into a restricted account
established under Section 2 of this Act. The moneys in the account shall be
divided into amounts for each postsecondary institution based on that
institution's portion of the intercollegiate athletics compensation to all
intercollegiate athletics compensation reported.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1867
(1) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall establish a restricted account to
receive the fees and penalties paid in accordance with Section 1 of this Act. The
moneys shall be divided as required in subsection (7) of Section 1 of this Act and
distributed to postsecondary institutions in accordance with this section.
(2) Each public postsecondary institution and each postsecondary institution licensed
by the council that participates in intercollegiate athletics as defined in KRS
164.6941 shall establish a scholarship program in compliance with this section
using the funds identified for that institution in Section 1 of this Act.
(3) To be eligible for an institution's scholarship, a student shall:
(a) Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(b) Be a Kentucky resident as determined by the institution in accordance with
criteria established by the council for the purposes of admission and tuition
assessment;
(c) Be enrolled at the institution as a student who is not a student-athlete
participating in intercollegiate athletics as defined in KRS 164.6941;
(d) Complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the academic
year in which the scholarship is awarded; and
(e) Complete and submit a scholarship application to the institution.
(4) (a) The institution shall annually grant scholarships under this section by
lottery from eligible student applicants.
(b) The number of the institution's students receiving a scholarship under this
section shall not be fewer than the number of institution's student-athletes
who received intercollegiate athletics compensation during the previous
year under Section 1 of this Act.
(c) The institution shall set the amount and duration of the scholarships and
may also set requirements for continued eligibility for the scholarship
beyond the eligibility requirements established in subsection (3) of this
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1867
section.
(5) The institution shall annually adopt a calendar for the operation of this section,
including application deadlines and lottery dates.
Section 3. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed